Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 2. Exempt Property and Allowances.

§ 64.2-309.
Family allowance.

In addition to any other right or allowance under this article, upon the death of a decedent who was domiciled in the Commonwealth, the surviving spouse and minor children whom the decedent was obligated to support are entitled to a reasonable allowance in money out of the estate for their maintenance during the period of administration, which allowance shall not continue for longer than one year if the estate is inadequate to discharge all allowed claims. The family allowance may be paid as a lump sum not to exceed $24,000, or in periodic installments not to exceed $2,000 per month for one year. It is payable to the surviving spouse for the use of the surviving spouse and minor children or, if there is no surviving spouse, to the person having the care and custody of the minor children. If any minor child is not living with the surviving spouse, the family allowance may be made partially to the spouse and partially to the person having the care and custody of the child, as their needs may appear. If there are no minor children, the allowance is payable to the surviving spouse.

The family allowance has priority over all claims against the estate.

The family allowance is in addition to any benefit or share passing to the surviving spouse or minor children by the will of the decedent, by intestate succession, or by way of elective share.

The death of any person entitled to a family allowance terminates the person’s right to any allowance not yet paid.

History.

1981, c. 580, §§ 64.1-151.1, 64.1-151.4; 1987, c. 222; 1990, c. 831; 1996, c. 549; 2001, c. 368; 2012, c. 614; 2014, c. 532.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 532, in subsection A, substituted “$24,000” for “$18,000” and “$2,000” for “$1,500.”

Law Review.

For article, “Support of the Surviving Spouse and Minor Children in Virginia: Proposed Legislation v. Present Law,” see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 639 (1980).

For article reviewing recent legislative and judicial developments in the Virginia law of wills, trusts, and estates, see 68 Va. L. Rev. 521 (1982).

For article, “How Bankruptcy Exemptions Work: Virginia As an Illustration of Why the ‘Opt Out’ Clause Was a Bad Idea,” see 8 G.M.U. L. Rev. 1 (1985).

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 845 (2001).

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 2A The Elective Share.
§ 2A.04 The Augmented Estate, et seq. Cox.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-823 General Creditor’s Complaint Against Estate of Decedent; No. 14-101 Antenuptial Agreement; No. 15-401 Checklist for Probate and Administration, et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Exemptions from Execution and Attachment, §§ 7, 12.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Editor’s note. —

The cases below were decided under former Title 64.1 and prior law.

Priority of payment. —

Estate and a surety company were ordered to pay claims by the wife of a decedent under §§ 64.1-151.1 and 64.1-151.2, as the executor breached her duties by paying claims against the estate other than death taxes and administrative costs prior to paying the wife’s claims, as the wife’s claims had priority under § 64.1-157. Hill v. Clarke, 71 Va. Cir. 377, 2006 Va. Cir. LEXIS 260 (Hopewell Aug. 16, 2006).

No waiver of allowance. —

Widow had not waived her claims to the family allowance and exempt property by signing a premarital agreement. The agreement limited the widow’s waiver to separate property and thus did not prevent her from claiming her statutory rights to marital property. Davenport v. Walters, 69 Va. Cir. 334, 2005 Va. Cir. LEXIS 332 (Norfolk Nov. 30, 2005).

Executor’s compliance with § 64.1-151.5 supported motion to affirm validity of election. —

Elections affirmed because: (1) an executor, who was also the decedent’s surviving spouse, complied with § 64.1-151.5 regarding her intent to claim the allowances enumerated thereunder; (2) a claim that she failed to make the election in her capacity as the surviving spouse, but as the estate’s executor, lacked merit; and (3) the court disagreed that the language in the deed in which the executor recorded said intent was precatory. In re Wisemiller, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 192 (Fairfax County Nov. 19, 2007).

Assets considered. —

Non-probate assets flowing to a spouse and the spouse’s independent sources of income were properly considered in denying the spouse’s request for a family allowance above $18,000 under § 64.1-151.1.Estate of Spears v. Spears, 2008 Va. Cir. LEXIS 149 (Fairfax County Nov. 3, 2008).

§ 64.2-310.
Exempt property.

In addition to any other right or allowance under this article, the surviving spouse of a decedent who was domiciled in the Commonwealth is entitled from the estate to value not exceeding $20,000 in excess of any security interests therein in household furniture, automobiles, furnishings, appliances, and personal effects. If there is no surviving spouse, the minor children of the decedent are entitled in equal shares to such property of the same value. If the value of the exempt property selected in excess of any security interests therein is less than $20,000, or if there is not $20,000 worth of exempt property in the estate, the spouse or minor children are entitled to other assets of the estate, if any, to the extent necessary to make up the $20,000 value.

The right to exempt property and other assets of the estate needed to make up a deficiency of exempt property has priority over all claims against the estate, except the family allowance.

The right to exempt property is in addition to any benefit or share passing to the surviving spouse or minor children by the will of the decedent, by intestate succession, or by way of elective share.

History.

1981, c. 580, § 64.1-151.2; 1990, c. 831; 1996, c. 549; 2001, c. 368; 2012, c. 614; 2014, c. 532.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 532, in subsection A, substituted “$20,000” for “$15,000” throughout the subsection.

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 24 Rights of Creditors. § 24.17 Priority Family Claims in Virginia. Cox.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-823 General Creditor’s Complaint Against Estate of Decedent; No. 14-101 Antenuptial Agreement; No. 15-401 Checklist for Probate and Administration, et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Exemptions from Execution and Attachment, §§ 7, 12, 21.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Editor’s note. —

The cases below were decided under former Title 64.1 and prior law.

Statutory allowances. —

Despite the lack of personal representative, § 6.1-125.8 [now see §

6.2-611

] provided that the funds in a joint bank account could be used to satisfy a widow’s allowance under § 64.1-151.2 when the assets of the estate were otherwise insufficient. Bray v. Ireland, 69 Va. Cir. 270, 2005 Va. Cir. LEXIS 333 (Norfolk Nov. 7, 2005).

Priority of payment. —

Estate and a surety company were ordered to pay claims by the wife of a decedent under §§ 64.1-151.1 and 64.1-151.2, as the executor breached her duties by paying claims against the estate other than death taxes and administrative costs prior to paying the wife’s claims, as the wife’s claims had priority under § 64.1-157. Hill v. Clarke, 71 Va. Cir. 377, 2006 Va. Cir. LEXIS 260 (Hopewell Aug. 16, 2006).

No waiver of exempt property. —

Widow had not waived her claims to the family allowance and exempt property by signing a premarital agreement. The agreement limited the widow’s waiver to separate property and thus did not prevent her from claiming her statutory rights to marital property. Davenport v. Walters, 69 Va. Cir. 334, 2005 Va. Cir. LEXIS 332 (Norfolk Nov. 30, 2005).

Elections affirmed. —

Elections affirmed because: (1) an executor, who was also the decedent’s surviving spouse, complied with § 64.1-151.5 regarding her intent to claim the allowances enumerated thereunder; (2) a claim that she failed to make the election in her capacity as the surviving spouse, but as the estate’s executor, lacked merit; and (3) the court disagreed that the language in the deed in which the executor recorded said intent was precatory. In re Wisemiller, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 192 (Fairfax County Nov. 19, 2007).

§ 64.2-311.
Homestead allowance.

In addition to any other right or allowance under this article, a surviving spouse of a decedent who was domiciled in the Commonwealth is entitled to a homestead allowance of $20,000. If there is no surviving spouse, each minor child of the decedent is entitled to a homestead allowance amounting to $20,000, divided by the number of minor children.

The homestead allowance has priority over all claims against the estate, except the family allowance and the right to exempt property.

The homestead allowance is in lieu of any share passing to the surviving spouse or minor children by the decedent’s will or by intestate succession; provided, however, if the amount passing to the surviving spouse and minor children by the decedent’s will or by intestate succession is less than $20,000, then the surviving spouse or minor children are entitled to a homestead allowance in an amount that when added to the property passing to the surviving spouse and minor children by the decedent’s will or by intestate succession, equals the sum of $20,000.

If the surviving spouse claims and receives an elective share of the decedent’s estate under §§

64.2-302

through

64.2-307

, the surviving spouse shall not have the benefit of any homestead allowance. If the surviving spouse claims and receives an elective share of the decedent’s estate under Article 1.1 (§

64.2-308.1

et seq.), the homestead allowance shall be in addition to any benefit or share passing to the surviving spouse by way of elective share.

History.

1981, c. 580, § 64.1-151.3; 1990, c. 831; 2001, c. 368; 2012, c. 614; 2014, c. 532; 2016, cc. 187, 269; 2017, cc. 32, 82.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, cc. 32 and 82, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act apply to the elective share of a surviving spouse of a decedent dying on or after January 1, 2017.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 532 substituted “$20,000” for “$15,000” throughout the section.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 187 and 269 are identical, and inserted “or Article 1.1 (§

64.2-308.1

et seq.), as applicable” in subsection D.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by c. 32, effective February 17, 2017, and c. 82, effective February 20, 2017, are identical, and in subsection D, deleted “or Article 1.1 (§

64.2-308.1

et seq.), as applicable” following “§§

64.2-302

through

64.2-307

” and added the last sentence. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For article, “How Bankruptcy Exemptions Work: Virginia As an Illustration of Why the ‘Opt Out’ Clause Was a Bad Idea,” see 8 G.M.U. L. Rev. 1 (1985).

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 2A The Elective Share.
§ 2A.02 In Virginia — Comparison of Elective Share Statutes, et seq. Cox.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-823 General Creditor’s Complaint Against Estate of Decedent; No. 14-101 Antenuptial Agreement; No. 15-401 Checklist for Probate and Administration, et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Exemptions from Execution and Attachment, §§ 7, 8, 12.

§ 64.2-312.
Source, determination, and documentation of family allowance, exempt property, and homestead allowance; petition for relief.

Property specifically bequeathed or devised shall not be used to satisfy the right to exempt property and the homestead allowance if there are sufficient assets in the estate otherwise to satisfy such rights. Subject to this restriction, the surviving spouse or the guardian of the minor children may select property of the estate as exempt property and the homestead allowance. The personal representative may make these selections if the surviving spouse or the guardian of the minor children is unable or fails to do so within a reasonable time, or if there is no guardian of the minor children. The personal representative may execute a deed of distribution to establish the ownership of property taken as the homestead allowance or exempt property, which deed, if executed, shall (i) describe the property with reasonable certainty and (ii) state the value of each asset included therein. The personal representative may determine the family allowance in a lump sum or periodic installments in accordance with §

64.2-309

. The personal representative may disburse funds of the estate in payment of the family allowance and in payment of any part of the exempt property or the homestead allowance that is payable in cash.

The personal representative or any interested person aggrieved by any selection, determination, payment, proposed payment, or failure to act under this section may petition the circuit court for appropriate relief, including the award of a family allowance that is larger or smaller than what the personal representative determined or could have determined. Such petition may be ex parte; provided, however, that the court in its discretion may require such notice to and the convening of interested parties as it may deem proper in each case.

History.

1981, c. 580, § 64.1-151.4; 1996, c. 549; 2001, c. 368; 2012, c. 614.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 14-101 Antenuptial Agreement; No. 15-448 Claim for Family Allowance, Exempt Property, and Homestead Allowance.

§ 64.2-313.
When and how exempt property and allowances may be claimed.

Any election to take a family allowance, exempt property, or a homestead allowance shall be made within one year from the decedent’s death. The election shall be made either in person before the court having jurisdiction over probate or administration of the decedent’s estate, or by a writing recorded in the court, or the clerk’s office thereof, upon such acknowledgment or proof as would authorize a writing to be admitted to record under Chapter 6 (§

55.1-600

et seq.) of Title 55.1.

History.

1981, c. 580, § 64.1-151.5; 2012, c. 614.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “Chapter 6 (§

55.1-600

et seq.) of Title 55.1” for “Chapter 6 (§ 55-106 et seq.) of Title 55.”

Law Review.

For annual survey article, see “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 189 (2013).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Exemptions from Execution and Attachment, § 7.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Executor’s compliance with § 64.1-151.5 supported motion to affirm validity of election. —

Elections affirmed because: (1) an executor, who was also the decedent’s surviving spouse, complied with § 64.1-151.5 regarding her intent to claim the allowances enumerated thereunder; (2) a claim that she failed to make the election in her capacity as the surviving spouse, but as the estate’s executor, lacked merit; and (3) the court disagreed that the language in the deed in which the executor recorded said intent was precatory.
In re Wisemiller, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 192 (Fairfax County Nov. 19, 2007) (decided under prior law).

Equities allowed election. —

As the language of § 64.1-151.5 was ambiguous as to notarization requirements, the court could consider a widow’s equitable arguments, which weighed in favor of recognizing her elections. Both the executor and the court were on notice of the widow’s intent to claim her allowances two months after the testator’s death, and no party would be prejudiced by allowing her to claim them.
Davenport v. Walters, 69 Va. Cir. 334, 2005 Va. Cir. LEXIS 332 (Norfolk Nov. 30, 2005) (decided under prior law).

§ 64.2-314.
Waiver.

The right of a decedent’s surviving spouse to a homestead allowance in the estate of a decedent as provided in §

64.2-311

may be waived during the decedent’s lifetime only by execution of a marital or premarital agreement in accordance with Chapter 8 (§

20-147

et seq.) of Title 20 or by execution of a waiver provided (i) the waiver is in writing, (ii) the language of the waiver mentions homestead allowance in conspicuous language, and (iii) the waiver has been signed by the surviving spouse.

The right to the family allowance and exempt property, as provided in §§

64.2-309

and

64.2-310

, may be waived during the decedent’s lifetime only by execution of a marital or premarital agreement made in accordance with Chapter 8 (§

20-147

et seq.) of Title 20.

History.

1990, c. 831, § 64.1-151.6; 2012, c. 614.